Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.450

Check cashers and sellers licensing applications.

Information in an application for licensing or a small loan endorsement under chapter 31.45 RCW regarding the personal residential address, telephone number of the applicant, or financial statement is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 274 s 425.]